Utah statutes.
77-18-12.   Grounds for denial of certificate of eligibility -- Effect of
prior convictions.
(1)  The division shall issue a certificate of eligibility to a petitioner
seeking to obtain expungement for a criminal record unless prior to issuing a
certificate of eligibility the division finds, through records of a
governmental agency, including national criminal data bases that:
(a)  the conviction for which expungement is sought is:
(i)  a capital felony;
(ii)  a first degree felony;
(iii)  a second degree forcible felony;
(iv)  automobile homicide;
(v)  a felony violation of Section 41-6a-502;
(vi)  a conviction involving a sexual act against a minor;
(vii)  any registerable sex offense as defined in Subsection 77-27-21.5(1)(n);
or
(viii)  an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any offense listed
in Subsection 77-27-21.5(1)(n);
(b)  the petitioner's record includes two or more convictions for any type of
offense that would be a felony under Utah law and that do not arise out of a
single criminal episode, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the
convictions occurred, unless the petitioner has received a pardon from the
Board of Pardons and Parole for either or both of the convictions;
(c)  the petitioner has previously obtained expungement in any jurisdiction of
a crime which would be a felony under Utah law;
(d)  the petitioner has previously obtained expungement in any jurisdiction of
two or more convictions which would be misdemeanors under Utah law unless the
convictions would be class B or class C misdemeanors under Utah law and 15
years have passed since these misdemeanor convictions;
(e)  the petitioner was convicted in any jurisdiction, subsequent to the
conviction for which expungement is sought and within the time periods
provided in Subsection (2), of a crime that would be a felony, misdemeanor, or
infraction under Utah law;
(f)  the petitioner has a combination of three or more convictions not arising
out of a single criminal episode, including any conviction for an offense
which would be a class B or class A misdemeanor or a felony under Utah law,
and including any misdemeanor and felony convictions previously expunged,
regardless of the jurisdiction in which the conviction or expungement
occurred, unless the petitioner has received a pardon from the Board of
Pardons and Parole for one or more of the convictions;
(g)  a proceeding involving a crime is pending or being instituted in any
jurisdiction against the petitioner; or
(h)  the petitioner has not paid the full amount of court ordered restitution
pursuant to Section 77-38a-302, or by the Board of Pardons and Parole pursuant
to Section 77-27-6 on the conviction for which the person is seeking an
expungement.
(2)  A conviction may not be included for purposes of Subsection (1)(e), and a
conviction may not be considered for expungement until, after the petitioner's
release from incarceration, parole, or probation, whichever occurs last and
all fines ordered by the court have been satisfied, at least the following
period of time has elapsed:
(a)  seven years in the case of a felony;
(b)  ten years in the case of:
(i)  a misdemeanor conviction or the equivalent of a misdemeanor conviction as
defined in Subsection 41-6a-501(2); or
(ii)  a felony violation of Subsection 58-37-8(2)(g);
(c)  five years in the case of a class A misdemeanor;
(d)  three years in the case of any other misdemeanor or infraction under
Title 76, Utah Criminal Code;
(e)  six years in the case of multiple class C misdemeanors;
(f)  12 years in the case of multiple class B misdemeanors; or
(g)  15 years in the case of multiple class A misdemeanors.
(3)  A petitioner who would not be eligible to receive a certificate of
eligibility under Subsection (1)(d) or (f) may receive a certificate of
eligibility for one additional expungement if at least 15 years have elapsed
since the last of:
(a)  release from incarceration, parole, or probation relating to the most
recent conviction; and
(b)  any other conviction which would have prevented issuance of a certificate
of eligibility under Subsection (1)(e).
(4)  If, after reasonable research, a disposition for an arrest on the
criminal history file is unobtainable, the division may issue a special
certificate giving discretion of eligibility to the court.
